Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-404
Board of Educational Lands and Funds; field notes of Surveyor General of the United States; receipt.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall, as custodian thereof, receive from the Surveyor General of the United States for the State of Nebraska, or from any other authorized officer or agent of the United States having the care, custody and safekeeping of the same, all the field notes, maps, charts, records, and all other papers appertaining or in any manner connected to or with the land titles within the State of Nebraska, including all surveys of lands within the state made under or by authority of the United States.

Laws 1889, c. 84, § 1, p. 567;

R.S.1913, § 5560;

C.S.1922, § 4864;

C.S.1929, § 84-403;

R.S.1943, § 84-404.